Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 653.020 is amended to read:
653.020. ORS 653.010 to 653.261 do not apply to any of the following employees:
(1) An individual employed in agriculture if:
(a) Such individual is employed as a hand harvest or pruning laborer and is paid on a piece-rate
basis in an operation which has been, and is customarily and  generally recognized as having been,
paid on a piece-rate basis in the region of employment and is employed by an employer who did not,
during any calendar quarter during  the preceding year, use more than 500 piece-rate-work-days of
agricultural labor;
(b) Such  individual is the parent, spouse, child or other member of the employer’s immediate
family;
(c) Such individual:
(A) Is employed as a hand harvest or pruning laborer and is paid on a  piece-rate basis in an
operation which has  been, and is customarily and generally recognized as having been, paid on a
piece-rate basis in the region of employment;
(B) Commutes daily from a permanent residence to the farm on which the  individual is so em-
ployed; and
(C) Has been  employed in agricultural labor less than 13 weeks during the preceding calendar
year;
(d) Such individual, other than an individual described in paragraph (c) of this subsection:
(A) Is 16  years of age or under and is employed as a hand harvest laborer, is paid on a piece-
rate basis in an operation which has been, and is customarily and  generally recognized as having
been, paid on a piece-rate basis in the region of employment; and
(B) Is paid at the same piece-rate as employees over 16 years of age on the same farm; or
(e) Such employee is principally engaged in the range production of  livestock and earns a salary
and is paid on a salary basis.
(2) An individual employed in domestic service on a casual basis in or about a family home.
(3) An individual engaged in administrative, executive or professional work who:
(a) Performs predominantly intellectual, managerial or creative tasks;
(b) Exercises discretion and independent judgment; and
(c) Earns a salary and is paid on a salary basis.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1518 (SB 1518-A) Page 1
(4) An individual employed by the United States.
(5) An individual who is employed by an institution whose function is primary or secondary ed-
ucation, and in which the individual is an enrolled student.
(6) An individual engaged in the capacity of an outside salesperson or taxicab operator.
(7) An individual domiciled at a  place of employment for the purpose of being available for
emergency or occasional duties for time  other than that spent performing these duties, provided that
when the individual performs emergency or occasional duties, the individual must be paid no  less
than the wage specified in ORS 653.025.
(8) An individual paid for  specified hours of employment, the only purpose of which is to be
available for recall to duty.
(9) An individual domiciled at multiunit  accommodations designed to provide other people with
temporary or permanent lodging, for the purpose of  maintenance, management or assisting in the
management of same.
(10) An individual employed on a seasonal basis at:
(a) An organized camp operated for profit that generates gross  annual income of less than
$500,000; or
(b) A nonprofit organized camp.
(11) An individual employed at a nonprofit conference ground or center operated for educational,
charitable or religious purposes.
(12) An individual who performs services as a volunteer firefighter, as defined in ORS 652.050.
(13) An individual who performs child care services in the  home of the individual or in the home
of the child.
(14) An individual employed in domestic service employment in or about a family home  to pro-
vide companionship services , as defined in 29 C.F.R. 552.6, as in effect on  January 1, 2016,  for
individuals who, because of age or infirmity, are unable to care for themselves , unless,  and only
to the extent that, the individual is employed, singly or jointly, by a third  party engaged in
the business of providing home care or companionship services .
(15) An individual who performs service as a caddy at a golf course  in an established program
for the training and supervision of caddies under the  direction of a person who is an employee of
the golf course.
(16) An individual who volunteers as a golf course marshal if:
(a) The services the individual  provides are limited to monitoring starting times and speed of
play and informing golfers of golf course etiquette;
(b) The individual  is not allowed to provide volunteer golf course marshal services for more than
30 hours in a calendar week; and
(c) The individual receives no wage other than golf passes for providing the volunteer golf
course marshal services.
(17) An individual employed as a resident manager by an adult foster home that is licensed
pursuant to ORS 443.705 to 443.825 and who is domiciled at the adult foster home.
(18) An individual residing in a mobile home park or manufactured dwelling park  designed to
provide other people with temporary or permanent lodging, for the  purpose of maintenance, man-
agement or in assisting in the management of same.
(19) An individual who volunteers as a campground host and who resides in a campground
owned by a public agency that provides temporary  accommodations for travelers, whether under
public or private management, and who provides information and emergency assistance.
(20) An individual who:
(a) Is registered with the National Ski Patrol or a  similar nonprofit ski patrol organization as
a nonprofessional ski patroller and who receives no wage other than  passes authorizing access to
and use  of a ski area, as defined in ORS 30.970, for performing ski patrol services, including but not
limited to services related to preserving the safety  of and providing information to skiers or
snowboarders; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1518 (SB 1518-A) Page 2
(b) Receives no wage other than passes authorizing access to and use  of a ski area, as defined
in ORS 30.970, for performing services directly related to the organizing or  conducting of skiing or
snowboarding races or other similar competitions that are:
(A) Sponsored and organized by a nonprofit corporation, as defined in ORS 65.001; and
(B) Held in a ski area, as defined in ORS 30.970.
(21) An individual who has  entered into a contract to play minor league baseball for a profes-
sional sports organization and who is subject  to a collective bargaining agreement, the terms of
which provide for the payment of wages and working conditions.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 653.547 is amended to read:
653.547. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Domestic service” means services related to  the care of persons in private homes or the
maintenance of private homes or their premises.
(b)(A) “Domestic worker”  means an individual who works in the home of another person for the
purpose of caring for a child, doing housekeeping or providing other domestic service and who  is
not compensated with public funds for the work performed.
(B) “Domestic worker” does not include:
(i) A parent or spouse of the employer.
(ii) A child of the employer who is under 26 years of age.
(iii) Students who regularly attend elementary or secondary school during the day.
(iv) Children, other than children of the employer, who are under 14 years of age.
(v) Children under 18  years of age who provide babysitting services and persons who provide
babysitting on a casual basis.
(vi) Persons who perform casual labor  in private homes or the maintenance of private homes
or their premises, including but not limited to yard work, washing windows and shoveling snow.
(vii) Individuals employed by organizations licensed as required by ORS 443.015 or 443.315.
(viii) Independent contractors.
(ix) Individuals performing companionship services [ exempt from the provisions of the Fair Labor
Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. 201 et seq.) ], as defined  in 29 C.F.R. 552.6, as in effect on Jan-
uary 1, 2016, unless, and only  to the extent that, the individuals are employed, singly or
jointly, by a third party engaged in the  business of providing home care or companionship
services.
(x) Persons who perform house sitting duties that do not involve domestic service.
(xi) Persons who provide domestic service in exchange for an in-kind good or service.
(c) “Employer” means a person that employs another person in this state.
(2) A person employing a domestic worker shall:
(a) Notwithstanding ORS 653.020, pay the domestic  worker an overtime wage at a rate of one
and one-half times the worker’s base rate for hours worked in excess of 40 hours in  a workweek,
or in excess of 44 hours in a workweek if the domestic worker lives in the home of the employer.
(b) Provide the domestic worker at least 24 consecutive hours of rest each workweek. If  the
domestic worker agrees to work on the anticipated day of rest, the employer shall pay  the employee
the overtime rate specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) If the domestic worker lives in the home of the employer, provide at least  eight consecutive
hours of rest within each 24-hour period and provide  a space with adequate conditions for uninter-
rupted sleep.
(d) If the domestic worker lives in the home of the employer, permit the domestic worker to cook
the worker’s own food,  subject to reasonable restrictions based on the religious or health needs of
the home’s residents.
(e) If the domestic worker  worked an average of at least 30 hours per week during the previous
year, provide the domestic worker with at least three paid personal leave days off.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of  this section, the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor
and Industries shall adopt rules  for the calculation of overtime wages for domestic workers during
periods of travel and medical emergencies.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1518 (SB 1518-A) Page 3
(4) A person that employs a domestic worker may not:
(a) Request that the domestic worker allow the employer, on  either a mandatory or voluntary
basis, to have possession of the worker’s passport.
(b) Engage in  unwelcome sexual advances, request sexual favors or engage in other verbal or
physical conduct of a sexual nature directed toward a domestic worker when:
(A) Submission to the conduct is made,  either explicitly or implicitly, a term or condition of the
domestic worker’s employment;
(B) Submission to or rejection of the conduct by the domestic worker is used  as the basis for
employment decisions affecting the domestic worker; or
(C) The conduct has the purpose or effect of unreasonably  interfering with the domestic
worker’s work performance by creating an intimidating, hostile or offensive work environment.
(c) Subject a domestic worker to harassment  based on gender, race, religion, disability, sexual
orientation, gender identity or national origin if the harassment has the purpose or effect of  unrea-
sonably interfering with the worker’s work performance by creating  an intimidating, hostile or of-
fensive work environment.
(d) Retaliate or in any way discriminate against an individual with respect to hire or  tenure or
any other  term or condition of employment because the individual has inquired about the provisions
of this section and ORS 653.549 or has reported a violation to, or filed a complaint with,  the Bureau
of Labor and Industries alleging a violation of this section.
Passed by Senate February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 20, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1518 (SB 1518-A) Page 4